Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201460-3,109
Well-boring apparatus and well-servicing
equipment license plates.

(1) Any owner of well-boring apparatus
and well-servicing equipment may make application to the county treasurer for
license plates.

(2) Well-boring apparatus and well-servicing equipment license plates
shall display thereon, in addition to the license number, the words special
equipment.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 109;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 66.